North Carolina, session 2025, HB326.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall study methods of
increasing teacher planning time or decreasing teacher obligations that decrease existing planning
time.
SECTION 1.(b) The Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee by February 15, 2026, on the results of the study. The report shall include
at least the following:
(1) Recommendations to increase teacher planning time.
(2) Recommendations to decrease teacher obligations that decrease existing
planning time.
(3) Costs associated with any recommendations given in the report.
(4) Any other information the Department deems relevant.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to conduct the study required by Section 1 of this act. The Department may
use these funds to partner with a third party to conduct the study.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H326-v-1*